Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-408
Permit fees; remittance.

Any county clerk, county official, or agent authorized to issue hunting, fishing, or fur-harvesting permits shall remit the fees for the permits to the commission in the manner and at the times prescribed by the rules and regulations of the commission.

Laws 1929, c. 112, II, § 5, p. 410;

C.S.1929, § 37-205;

R.S.1943, § 37-205;

Laws 1989, LB 34, § 6;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-205;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 118;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 20.